Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-7461
Unlawful acts.

It is unlawful for any person to commit or to permit, cause, aid, or abet the commission of any of the following acts in this state:

(1) Any violation of the Wholesale Drug Distributor Licensing Act or rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the act;

(2) Providing the department, any of its representatives, or any federal official with false or fraudulent records or making false or fraudulent statements regarding any matter under the act;

(3) Obtaining or attempting to obtain a prescription drug by fraud, deceit, or misrepresentation or engaging in misrepresentation or fraud in the distribution of a prescription drug;

(4) Except for the wholesale distribution by manufacturers of a prescription drug that has been delivered into commerce pursuant to an application approved under federal law by the federal Food and Drug Administration, the manufacture, repackaging, sale, transfer, delivery, holding, or offering for sale of any prescription drug that is adulterated, misbranded, counterfeit, suspected of being counterfeit, or otherwise rendered unfit for distribution;

(5) Except for the wholesale distribution by manufacturers of a prescription drug that has been delivered into commerce pursuant to an application approved under federal law by the federal Food and Drug Administration, the adulteration, misbranding, or counterfeiting of any prescription drug;

(6) The receipt of any prescription drug that is adulterated, misbranded, stolen, obtained by fraud or deceit, counterfeit, or suspected of being counterfeit, and the delivery or proffered delivery of such drug for pay or otherwise; and

(7) The alteration, mutilation, destruction, obliteration, or removal of the whole or any part of the labeling of a prescription drug or the commission of any other act with respect to a prescription drug that results in the prescription drug being misbranded.

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 35.